Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 2
Credit Insurance

§ 28-44-201. Term of insurance.

Credit insurance provided by a creditor may be subject to the furnishing of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer. Whether or not such evidence is required, the term of the insurance shall commence no later than when the debtor becomes obligated to the creditor or when the debtor applies for the insurance, whichever is later, except as follows:

If any required evidence of insurability is not furnished until more than thirty (30) days after the term would otherwise commence, the term may commence on the date when the insurer determines the evidence to be satisfactory; or

If the creditor provides insurance not previously provided covering debts previously created, the term may commence on the effective date of the policy.

The originally scheduled term of the insurance shall extend at least until the due date of the last scheduled payment of the debt except as follows:

If the insurance relates to an open-end consumer credit account, the term need only extend until the payment of the debt under the account and may be sooner terminated after at least thirty (30) days notice to the debtor; or

If the debtor is advised in writing that the insurance will be written for a specified shorter time, the term need only extend until the end of the specified time.

The term of the insurance shall not extend more than fifteen (15) days after the originally scheduled due date of the last scheduled payment of the debt unless it is extended without additional cost to the debtor or as an incident to a deferral, refinancing, or consolidation.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-201, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-202. Amount of insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:

In the case of credit insurance providing life coverage on an individual policy basis, the amount of insurance may not initially exceed the debt and, if the debt is payable in installments, may not at any time exceed the greater of the scheduled or actual amount of the debt. The amount of insurance provided under a group life insurance contract shall be subject to the applicable provisions of sections 41-2005 (debtor groups) and 41-2306 (amount of insurance), Idaho Code; or

In the case of any other credit insurance, the total amount of periodic benefits payable may not exceed the total of scheduled unpaid installments of the debt, and the amount of any periodic benefit may not exceed the original amount of debt divided by the number of periodic installments in which it is payable.

If credit insurance is provided in connection with an open-end consumer credit account, the amounts payable as insurance benefits may be reasonably commensurate with the amount of debt as it exists from time to time. If credit insurance is provided in connection with a commitment to grant credit in the future, the amounts payable as insurance benefits may be reasonably commensurate with the total from time to time of the amount of debt and the amount of the commitment. The amount of all group life insurance issued under this subsection shall further be subject to the applicable provisions of sections 41-2005 (debtor groups), 41-2306 (amount of insurance), and 41-2308 (provisions of policies and certificates of insurance — disclosure to debtors), Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-202, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-203. Filing and approval of rates and forms.

A creditor may not use a form or a schedule of premium rates or charges, the filing of which is required by this section, if the director of the department of insurance has disapproved the form or schedule and has notified the insurer of his disapproval. A creditor may not use a form or schedule unless:

The form or schedule has been on file with the director of the department of insurance for thirty (30) days, or has earlier been approved by him; and

The insurer has complied with this section with respect to the insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all policies, certificates of insurance, notices of proposed insurance, applications for insurance, endorsements and riders relating to credit insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this state, and the schedules of premium rates or charges pertaining thereto, shall be filed by the insurer with the director of the department of insurance. Within thirty (30) days after the filing of any form or schedule, he shall disapprove it if the premium rates or charges are unreasonable in relation to the benefits provided under the form, or if the form contains provisions which are unjust, unfair, inequitable, or deceptive, or encourage misrepresentation of the coverage, or are contrary to any provision of the Credit Insurance Act or of any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder.

If a group policy has been delivered in another state, the forms to be filed by the insurer with the director of the department of insurance are the group certificates and notices of proposed insurance. He shall approve them if:

They provide the information that would be required if the group policy were delivered in this state; and

The applicable premium rates or charges do not exceed those established by his rules or regulations.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-203, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.